Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-719
Certain vendor payments prohibited.

No payments shall be made to any vendor, under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as reimbursement for dues for any educational or professional association.

Laws 1982, LB 933, § 6.